dictionaries/ca-valencia/index.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: oferir
SFX 71 Y 94
SFX 71 r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 71 r nt/_C ir
SFX 71 r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 71 ir t/_v_Y ir
SFX 71 r da/_Y ir
SFX 71 ir ta/_Y ir
SFX 71 r ts/_Y ir
SFX 71 ir ts/_Y ir
SFX 71 r des/_Y ir
SFX 71 ir tes/_Y ir
SFX 71 ir eixo/_Z ir
SFX 71 r sc/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir esc/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir eixes/_Z ir
SFX 71 r xes/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir eix/_Z ir
SFX 71 r x/_Z ir
SFX 71 r m/_Z ir
SFX 71 r u/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir eixen/_Z ir
SFX 71 r xen/_Z ir
SFX 71 r a/_Z ir
SFX 71 r es/_Z ir
SFX 71 r a/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 71 r en/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 71 r res/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 71 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 71 r ré/_Z ir
SFX 71 r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 71 r rà/_Z ir
SFX 71 r rem/_Z ir
SFX 71 r reu/_Z ir
SFX 71 r ran/_Z ir
SFX 71 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 71 r ries/_Z ir
SFX 71 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 71 r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 71 r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 71 r rien/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 71 r sca/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir esques/_Z ir
SFX 71 r sques/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir esquis/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir eixis/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 71 r sca/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 71 r m/_Z ir
SFX 71 r guem/_Z ir
SFX 71 r u/_Z ir
SFX 71 r gueu/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir esquen/_Z ir
SFX 71 r squen/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir esquin/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir eixin/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 71 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 71 r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 71 r res/_Z ir
SFX 71 r sses/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 71 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 71 r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 71 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 71 r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 71 ir eix/_C ir
SFX 71 r x/_C ir
SFX 71 ir esca/_D ir
SFX 71 r sca/_D ir
SFX 71 ir esqui/_D ir
SFX 71 ir eixi/_D ir
SFX 71 r m/_C ir
SFX 71 r guem/_C ir
SFX 71 r u/_C ir
SFX 71 ir esquen/_C ir
SFX 71 r squen/_C ir
SFX 71 ir esquin/_C ir
SFX 71 ir eixin/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: ofrenar
SFX 72 Y 84
SFX 72 r r/_v_C_Y ar
SFX 72 r nt/_C ar
SFX 72 r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 72 r da/_Y ar
SFX 72 r ts/_Y ar
SFX 72 r des/_Y ar
SFX 72 ar o/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 72 enar èn/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 72 r 0/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 72 r m/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 72 r u/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 72 r va/_Z ar
SFX 72 r ves/_Z ar
SFX 72 r va/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 72 r ven/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar í/_Z ar
SFX 72 r res/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar à/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 72 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 72 r ré/_Z ar
SFX 72 r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 72 r rà/_Z ar
SFX 72 r rem/_Z ar
SFX 72 r reu/_Z ar
SFX 72 r ran/_Z ar
SFX 72 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 72 r ries/_Z ar
SFX 72 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 72 r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 72 r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 72 r rien/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar is/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar in/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 72 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar essis/_Z ar
SFX 72 r res/_Z ar
SFX 72 r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar esses/_Z ar
SFX 72 r sses/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 72 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar éssim/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar éssem/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar éssiu/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar ésseu/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar essin/_Z ar
SFX 72 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 72 r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 72 ar essen/_Z ar
SFX 72 r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 72 r 0/_D ar
SFX 72 ar e/_D ar
SFX 72 ar i/_D ar
SFX 72 ar em/_C ar
SFX 72 r u/_C ar
SFX 72 ar eu/_C ar
SFX 72 ar en/_C ar
SFX 72 ar in/_C ar

# Model de conjugació: oir
SFX 73 Y 92
SFX 73 r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 73 r nt/_C ir
SFX 73 ir ït/_v_Y ir
SFX 73 ir ïda/_Y ir
SFX 73 ir ïts/_Y ir
SFX 73 ir ïdes/_Y ir
SFX 73 ir eixo/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïsc/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir esc/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir eixes/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir us/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïxes/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir eix/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir u/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïx/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïm/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïu/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir eixen/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir uen/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïxen/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïa/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïes/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïa/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïen/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïres/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïren/_Z ir
SFX 73 r ré/_Z ir
SFX 73 r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 73 r rà/_Z ir
SFX 73 r rem/_Z ir
SFX 73 r reu/_Z ir
SFX 73 r ran/_Z ir
SFX 73 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 73 r ries/_Z ir
SFX 73 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 73 r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 73 r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 73 r rien/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïsca/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir esques/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïsques/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir esquis/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir eixis/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïsca/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïm/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïguem/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïu/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïgueu/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir esquen/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïsquen/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir esquin/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir eixin/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïra/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïssis/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïres/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïsses/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïra/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïssin/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïren/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir ïssen/_Z ir
SFX 73 ir eix/_C ir
SFX 73 ir esca/_D ir
SFX 73 ir ïsca/_D ir
SFX 73 ir esqui/_D ir
SFX 73 ir eixi/_D ir
SFX 73 ir ïm/_C ir
SFX 73 ir ïguem/_C ir
SFX 73 ir ïu/_C ir
SFX 73 ir esquen/_C ir
SFX 73 ir ïsquen/_C ir
SFX 73 ir esquin/_C ir
SFX 73 ir eixin/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: omplir
SFX 74 Y 82
SFX 74 r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 74 r nt/_C ir
SFX 74 ir ert/_v_Y ir
SFX 74 r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 74 ir erta/_Y ir
SFX 74 r da/_Y ir
SFX 74 ir erts/_Y ir
SFX 74 r ts/_Y ir
SFX 74 ir ertes/_Y ir
SFX 74 r des/_Y ir
SFX 74 ir o/_Z ir
SFX 74 omplir òmplic/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir 0/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir es/_Z ir
SFX 74 r s/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir e/_Z ir
SFX 74 r 0/_Z ir
SFX 74 r m/_Z ir
SFX 74 r u/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir en/_Z ir
SFX 74 r n/_Z ir
SFX 74 r a/_Z ir
SFX 74 r es/_Z ir
SFX 74 r a/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 74 r en/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 74 r res/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ré/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 74 r rà/_Z ir
SFX 74 r rem/_Z ir
SFX 74 r reu/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ran/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ries/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 74 r rien/_Z ir
SFX 74 omplir òmpliga/_Z ir
SFX 74 r 0/_Z ir
SFX 74 omplir òmpligues/_Z ir
SFX 74 r s/_Z ir
SFX 74 omplir òmpliga/_Z ir
SFX 74 r 0/_Z ir
SFX 74 r m/_Z ir
SFX 74 r guem/_Z ir
SFX 74 r u/_Z ir
SFX 74 r gueu/_Z ir
SFX 74 omplir òmpliguen/_Z ir
SFX 74 r n/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 74 r res/_Z ir
SFX 74 r sses/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 74 r 0/_D ir
SFX 74 ir e/_D ir
SFX 74 omplir òmpliga/_D ir
SFX 74 r 0/_D ir
SFX 74 r m/_C ir
SFX 74 r guem/_C ir
SFX 74 r u/_C ir
SFX 74 omplir òmpliguen/_C ir
SFX 74 r n/_C ir
