dictionaries/ca-valencia/index.dic
ablenar/72
adotzenar/72
alenar/72
alienar/72
alquenar/72
alumenar/72
amargenar/72
anomenar/72
apenar/72
arenar/72
asserenar/72
atermenar/72
autoanomenar/72
besllumenar/72
cadenar/72
carenar/72
carmenar/72
cognomenar/72
concatenar/72
desalenar/72
desalienar/72
desarenar/72
desembenar/72
desencadenar/72
desencovenar/72
desenfrenar/72
desenravenar/72
desfrenar/72
deshidrogenar/72
desllemenar/72
desoir/73
desomplir/74
desoxigenar/72
destermenar/72
destrenar/72
eixamenar/72
embenar/72
emmenar/72
empenar/72
emplenar/72
encadenar/72
encovenar/72
enfrenar/72
enllemenar/72
enllumenar/72
enravenar/72
entreoir/73
entretzenar/72
esblenar/72
escarmenar/72
esgramenar/72
esllemenar/72
esmargenar/72
esmenar/72
esquenar/72
estamenar/72
extravenar/72
hidrogenar/72
malmenar/72
margenar/72
nitrogenar/72
nomenar/72
oferir/71
ofrenar/72
oir/73
omplir/74
oxigenar/72
reanomenar/72
refrenar/72
remenar/72
reomplir/74
sobrenomenar/72
sofrenar/72
termenar/72
terraplenar/72
